Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.200

Account—Budget request—Fees.

(1) The board shall set fees at a level adequate to pay the costs of administering this chapter. All fees and fines collected under this chapter shall be paid into the professional engineers' account established under RCW 18.43.150. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation and must be used to carry out all the purposes and provisions of this chapter and chapter 18.43 RCW, including the cost of administering this chapter.

(2) The director shall biennially prepare a budget request based on the anticipated cost of administering licensing and certification activities. The budget request shall include the estimated income from fees contained in this chapter.

[ 2019 c 442 s 22; 1999 c 263 s 21.]